src/fst/morphology/ext-github_kristiank/data/giellatekno/gt-norm-yamls/N-partw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# This gold standard is automatically generated from the Votic dictionary
# at Språkbanken (https://spraakbanken.gu.se/karp/#?mode=votiska)

Tests:
  Noun - partõ :   # should decline like the paradigm 'asPartõ'
    partõ+N+Sg+Nom: partõ
    partõ+N+Pl+Nom: parrõd
    partõ+N+Sg+Gen: parra
    partõ+N+Pl+Gen: [partoi, partojõ]
    partõ+N+Sg+Par: [parta, partaa]
    partõ+N+Pl+Par: [partoi, partoitõ]
    partõ+N+Sg+Ill: [partasõ, parta]
    partõ+N+Pl+Ill: partoisõ
    partõ+N+Sg+Ine: parrõz
    partõ+N+Pl+Ine: partoiz
    partõ+N+Sg+Ela: parrõssõ
    partõ+N+Pl+Ela: partoissõ
    partõ+N+Sg+All: parrõllõ
    partõ+N+Pl+All: partoillõ
    partõ+N+Sg+Ade: parrõl
    partõ+N+Pl+Ade: partoil
    partõ+N+Sg+Abl: parrõltõ
    partõ+N+Pl+Abl: partoiltõ
    partõ+N+Sg+Tra: parrõssi
    partõ+N+Pl+Tra: partoissi
    partõ+N+Sg+Ter: partassaa
    partõ+N+Pl+Ter: partoissaa
    partõ+N+Sg+Com: parraka
    partõ+N+Pl+Com: partoika
